Utah statutes.
49-23-103.   Creation of system.

(1)  There is created for members employed by a participating employer the "New Public Safety and Firefighter Tier II Contributory Retirement System."

(2)  The New Public Safety and Firefighter Tier II Contributory Retirement System includes:

(a)  the Tier II hybrid retirement system created in Part 3, Tier II Hybrid Retirement System; and

(b)  the Tier II defined contribution plan created in Part 4, Tier II Defined Contribution Plan.



Enacted by Chapter 266, 2010 General Session

